Tennessee, session 114, HB0123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 59-8-302(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "under § 59-8-301(f)" and deleting the final sentence in the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 59-8-302(b), is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions and redesignating the existing subdivision (b)(2) accordingly:
(2) Prior to filing a statement pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), the commissioner
shall notify a property owner of the proposed creation of a lien under this subsection (b),
the amount of the proposed lien, and the ability of the property owner to avoid the lien
under subdivision (b)(3).
(3) A lien must not be filed under this section against a property owner who:
(A) Did not consent to, participate in, or exercise control over the mining
operation which necessitated the reclamation performed hereunder; or
(B) Pays the department the amount of the proposed lien specified in the
notice provided pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) prior to the filing of a statement by
the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0123
001208
- 1 -